Utah statutes.
16-10a-809.   Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

(1)  The district court of the county in this state where a corporation's principal office is located or, if it has no principal office in this state, the district court for Salt Lake County may remove a director in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation or by its shareholders holding at least 10% of the outstanding shares of any class if the court finds that:

(a)  the director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct or gross abuse of authority or discretion with respect to the corporation; and

(b)  removal is in the best interest of the corporation.

(2)  The court that removes a director may bar the director from reelection for a period prescribed by the court.

(3)  If shareholders commence a proceeding under Subsection (1), they shall make the corporation a party defendant.

(4)  A director who is removed pursuant to this section may deliver to the division for filing a statement to that effect pursuant to Section 16-10a-1608.

